Illinois, session 104th, HB1820.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-114.5 and 4-114.2 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-114.5)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-114.5)7    Sec. 3-114.5. Reduction of disability and survivor's 8benefits for corresponding benefits payable under Workers' 9Compensation and Workers' Occupational Diseases Acts. 10    (a) Whenever a person is entitled to a disability or 11survivor's benefit under this Article and to benefits under 12the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 13Diseases Act for the same injury or disease, the benefits 14payable under this Article shall be reduced by an amount 15computed in accordance with subsection (b) of this Section. 16There shall be no reduction, however, for any of the 17following: payments for medical, surgical and hospital 18services, non-medical remedial care and treatment rendered in 19accordance with a religious method of healing recognized by 20the laws of this State and for artificial appliances; payments 21made for scheduled losses for the loss of or permanent and 22complete or permanent and partial loss of the use of any bodily 23member or the body taken as a whole under subdivision (d)2 or   HB1820- 2 -LRB104 06012 RPS 16045 b1subsection (e) of Section 8 of the Workers' Compensation Act 2or Section 7 of the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act; 3payments made for statutorily prescribed losses under 4subdivision (d)2 of Section 8 of the Workers' Compensation Act 5or Section 7 of the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act; and 6that portion of the payments which is utilized to pay 7attorneys' fees and the costs of securing the workers' 8compensation benefits under either the Workers' Compensation 9Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act.10    In addition, if a person is entitled to a survivor's 11benefit under Section 3-112 as a result of the decedent's 12sickness, accident, or injury incurred in or resulting from 13the performance of an act of duty or from the cumulative 14effects of acts of duty, then there shall be no reduction in 15the benefits payable to that person under this Article. 16    (b) The reduction prescribed by this Section shall be 17computed as follows:18        (1) In the event that a person entitled to benefits 19    under this Article incurs costs or attorneys' fees in 20    order to establish his entitlement, the reduction 21    prescribed by this Section shall itself be reduced by the 22    amount of such costs and attorneys' fees.23        (2) If the benefits deductible under this Section are 24    stated in a weekly amount, the monthly amount for the 25    purpose of this Section shall be 52 times the weekly 26    amount, divided by 12.  HB1820- 3 -LRB104 06012 RPS 16045 b1(Source: P.A. 84-1472.) 2    (40 ILCS 5/4-114.2)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-114.2)3    Sec. 4-114.2. Reduction of disability and survivor's 4benefits for corresponding benefits payable under Workers' 5Compensation and Workers' Occupational Diseases Acts. 6    (a) Whenever a person is entitled to a disability or 7survivor's benefit under this Article and to benefits under 8the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 9Diseases Act for the same injury or disease, the benefits 10payable under this Article shall be reduced by an amount 11computed in accordance with subsection (b) of this Section. 12There shall be no reduction, however, for any of the 13following: payments for medical, surgical and hospital 14services, non-medical remedial care and treatment rendered in 15accordance with a religious method of healing recognized by 16the laws of this State and for artificial appliances; payments 17made for scheduled losses for the loss of or permanent and 18complete or permanent and partial loss of the use of any bodily 19member or the body taken as a whole under subdivision (d)2 or 20subsection (e) of Section 8 of the Workers' Compensation Act 21or Section 7 of the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act; 22payments made for statutorily prescribed losses under 23subdivision (d)2 of Section 8 of the Workers' Compensation Act 24or Section 7 of the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act; and 25that portion of the payments which is utilized to pay   HB1820- 4 -LRB104 06012 RPS 16045 b1attorneys' fees and the costs of securing the workers' 2compensation benefits under either the Workers' Compensation 3Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act.4    In addition, if a person is entitled to a survivor's 5benefit under Section 4-114 as a result of the decedent's 6sickness, accident, or injury incurred in or resulting from 7the performance of an act of duty or from the cumulative 8effects of acts of duty, then there shall be no reduction in 9the benefits payable to that person under this Article. 10    (b) The reduction prescribed by this Section shall be 11computed as follows:12        (1) In the event that a person entitled to benefits 13    under this Article incurs costs or attorneys' fees in 14    order to establish his entitlement, the reduction 15    prescribed by this Section shall itself be reduced by the 16    amount of such costs and attorneys' fees.17        (2) If the benefits deductible under this Section are 18    stated in a weekly amount, the monthly amount for the 19    purpose of this Section shall be 52 times the weekly 20    amount, divided by 12.21(Source: P.A. 84-1039.) 22    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 23Section 8.49 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)  HB1820- 5 -LRB104 06012 RPS 16045 b1    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 28 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 3the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 4Act of the 104th General Assembly.